California statutes. Penal Code
(B) A cabinet with electrical wiring and provisions for mounting a coin, token, or currency acceptor and provisions for mounting a dispenser of coins, tokens, or anything of value.

(C) A storage medium containing the source language or executable code of a computer program that cannot be reasonably demonstrated to have any use other than in a slot machine.

(D) An assembled video display unit.

(E) An assembled mechanical or electromechanical display unit intended for use in gambling.

(F) An assembled mechanical or electromechanical unit which cannot be demonstrated to have any use other than in a slot machine.

(3) Any mechanical, electrical, or other device that may be connected to or used with a slot machine to alter the normal criteria of random selection or affect the outcome of a game.

(4) A system for the accounting or management of any game in which the result of the wager is determined electronically by using any combination of hardware or software for computers.

(5) Any combination of one of the components set forth in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2) and any other component that the commission determines, by regulation, to be a machine used directly or remotely in connection with gaming or any game which affects the results of a wager by determining a win or loss.

(g) “Past-posting” means the placing of a wager by an individual at a game after having knowledge of the result or outcome of that game.

(h) “Pinching wagers” means to reduce the amount wagered or to cancel the wager after acquiring knowledge of the outcome of the game or other event that is the subject of the wager.

(i) “Pressing wagers” means to increase a wager after acquiring knowledge of the outcome of the game or other event that is the subject of the wager.

(j) “Tribal Gaming Agency” means the person, agency, board, committee, commission, or council designated under tribal law, including, but not limited to, an intertribal gaming regulatory agency approved to fulfill those functions by the National Indian Gaming Commission, as primarily responsible for carrying out the regulatory responsibilities of the tribe under the Indian Gaming and Regulatory Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701) and a tribal gaming ordinance.

(k) “Wagering credit” means a representative of value, other than a chip, token, or wagering instrument, that is used for wagering at a game or gaming device and is obtained by the payment of cash or a cash equivalent, the use of a wagering instrument or the electronic transfer of money.

(l) “Wagering instrument” means a representative of value, other than a chip or token, that is issued by a licensee and approved by the California Gambling Control Commission or a tribal gaming agency, for use in a cashless wagering system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

337u.

It is unlawful for any person to commit any of the following acts:

(a) To alter or misrepresent the outcome of a gambling game or other event on which wagers lawfully have been made after the outcome is determined, but before it is revealed to the players.

(b) To place, increase, or decrease a wager or to determine the course of play after acquiring knowledge, not available to all players, of the outcome of the gambling game or any event that affects the outcome of the gambling game or which is the subject of the wager or to aid anyone in acquiring that knowledge for the purpose of placing, increasing, or decreasing a wager or determining the course of play contingent upon that event or outcome.

(c) To claim, collect, or take, or attempt to claim, collect, or take, money or anything of value in or from a gambling game, with intent to defraud, without having made a wager contingent on the game, or to claim, collect, or take an amount greater than the amount actually won.

(d) Knowingly to entice or induce another to go to any place where a gambling game is being conducted or operated in violation of this section, or Section 337v, 337w, 337x, or 337y, with the intent that the other person play or participate in that gambling game.

(e) To place or increase a wager after acquiring knowledge of the outcome of the gambling game or other event which is the subject of the wager, including past-posting and pressing wagers.

(f) To reduce the amount wagered or cancel the wager after acquiring knowledge of the outcome of the gambling game or other event which is the subject of the bet, including pinching wagers.

(g) To manipulate, with the intent to cheat, any component of a gambling game device in a manner contrary to the designed and normal operational purpose for the component, including, but not limited to, varying the pull of the handle of a slot machine, with knowledge that the manipulation affects the outcome of the gambling game or with knowledge of any event that affects the outcome of the gambling game.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 225.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

337v.

It is unlawful for any person at a gambling establishment to use, or to possess with the intent to use, any device to assist in any of the following:

(a) In projecting the outcome of the gambling game.

(b) In keeping track of the cards played.

(c) In analyzing the probability of the occurrence of an event relating to the gambling game.

(d) In analyzing the strategy for playing or wagering to be used in the gambling game, except as permitted by the California Gambling Control Commission or a tribal gaming agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 624, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

337w.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to use counterfeit chips, counterfeit debit instruments, or other counterfeit wagering instruments in a gambling game, the equipment associated with a gambling game, or a cashless wagering system.

(b) It is unlawful for any person, in playing or using any gambling game, the equipment associated with a gambling game, or a cashless wagering system designed to be played with, receive, or be operated by chips, tokens, wagering credits or other wagering instruments approved by the California Gambling Control Commission or a tribal gaming agency, or by lawful coin of the United States of America to either:

(1) Knowingly use chips, tokens, wagering credits, or other wagering instruments not approved by the California Gambling Control Commission or a tribal gaming agency, or lawful coin, legal tender of the United States of America, or use coins or tokens not of the same denomination as the coins or tokens intended to be used in that gambling game, associated equipment, or cashless wagering system.

(2) Use any device or means to violate this section or Section 337u, 337v, 337x, or 337y.

(c) It is unlawful for any person, not a duly authorized employee of a gambling establishment acting in furtherance of his or her employment within that establishment, to possess any device intended to be used to violate this section or Section 337u, 337v, 337x, or 337y.

(d) It is unlawful for any person, not a duly authorized employee of a gambling establishment acting in furtherance of his or her employment within that establishment, to possess any key or device known to have been designed for the purpose of, and suitable for, opening, entering, or affecting the operation of any gambling game, cashless wagering system, or dropbox, or for removing money or other contents from the game, system, or box.

(e) It is unlawful for any person to possess any paraphernalia for manufacturing slugs. As used in this subdivision, “paraphernalia for manufacturing slugs” means the equipment, products, and materials that are intended for use or designed for use in manufacturing, producing, fabricating, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, storing, or concealing a counterfeit facsimile of the chips, tokens, debit instruments, or other wagering instruments approved by the California Gambling Control Commission or a tribal gaming agency, or a lawful coin of the United States, the use of which is unlawful pursuant to subdivision (b). The term “paraphernalia for manufacturing slugs” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Lead or lead alloys.

(2) Molds, forms, or similar equipment capable of producing a likeness of a gaming token or lawful coin of the United States.

(3) Melting pots or other receptacles.

(4) Torches.

(5) Tongs, trimming tools, or other similar equipment.

(6) Equipment which can be reasonably demonstrated to manufacture facsimiles of debit instruments or wagering instruments approved by the California Gambling Control Commission or a tribal gaming agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 624, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

337x.

It is unlawful to cheat at any gambling game in a gambling establishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 624, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

337y.

It is unlawful to do either of the following:

(a) Manufacture, sell, or distribute any cards, chips, dice, game, or device which is intended to be used to violate Section 337u, 337v, 337w, or 337x.

(b) Mark, alter, or otherwise modify any gambling game device or associated equipment in a manner that either:

(1) Affects the result of a wager by determining win or loss.

(2) Alters the normal criteria of random selection, which affects the operation of a gambling game or which determines the outcome of a game.

(c) It is unlawful for any person to instruct another in cheating or in the use of any device for that purpose, with the knowledge or intent that the information or use conveyed may be employed to violate Section 337u, 337v, 337w, or 337x.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 624, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

337z.

(a) Any person who violates Section 337u, 337v, 337w, 337x, or 337y shall be punished as follows:

(1) For the first violation, by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not to exceed one year, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(2) For a second or subsequent violation of any of those sections, by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not to exceed one year or by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(b) A person who attempts to violate Section 337u, 337v, 337w, 337x, or 337y shall be punished in the same manner as the underlying crime.

(c) This section does not preclude prosecution under Section 332 or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 546, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Horse Racing [337.1. - 337.9.]

337.1.

Any person, who knowingly and designedly by false representation attempts to, or does persuade, procure or cause another person to wager on a horse in a race to be run in this state or elsewhere, and upon which money is wagered in this state, and who asks or demands compensation as a reward for information or purported information given in such case is a tout, and is guilty of touting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

337.2.

Any person who is a tout, or who attempts or conspires to commit touting, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. For a second offense in this State, he shall be imprisoned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1524.)
-------------------------------------------

337.3.

Any person who in the commission of touting falsely uses the name of any official of the California Horse Racing Board, its inspectors or attachés, or of any official of any race track association, or the names of any owner, trainer, jockey or other person licensed by the California Horse Racing Board as the source of any information or purported information is guilty of a felony and is punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 326.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

337.4.

Any person who in the commission of touting obtains money in excess of nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) may, in addition to being prosecuted for the violation of any provision of this chapter, be prosecuted for the violation of Section 487 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 8.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

337.5.

Any person who has been convicted of touting, and the record of whose conviction on such charge is on file in the office of the California Horse Racing Board or in the State Bureau of Criminal Identification and Investigation or of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or any person who has been ejected from any racetrack of this or any other state for touting or practices inimical to the public interest shall be excluded from all racetracks in this State. Any such person who refuses to leave such track when ordered to do so by inspectors of the California Horse Racing Board, or by any peace officer, or by an accredited attaché of a racetrack or association is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

337.6.

Any credential or license issued by the California Horse Racing Board to licensees, if used by the holder thereof for a purpose other than identification and in the performance of legitimate duties on a race track, shall be automatically revoked whether so used on or off a race track.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1524.)
-------------------------------------------

337.7.

Any person other than the lawful holder thereof who has in his possession any credential or license issued by the California Horse Racing Board to licensees and any person who has a forged or simulated credential or license of said board in his possession, and who uses such credential or license for the purpose of misrepresentation, fraud or touting is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by both that fine and imprisonment. If he or she has previously been convicted of any offense under this chapter, he or she shall be imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 327.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

337.8.

Any person who uses any credential, other than a credential or license issued by the California Horse Racing Board, for the purpose of touting is guilty of touting, and if the credential has been forged shall be imprisoned as provided in this chapter, whether the offense was committed on or off a race track.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1524.)
-------------------------------------------

337.9.

The executive director and chief of licensing and enforcement of the California Horse Racing Board shall coordinate a policy for the enforcement of this chapter with all other enforcement bureaus in the state in order to ensure prosecution of all persons who commit any offense against the horse racing laws of this state. For those purposes, the chief of licensing and enforcement is a peace officer and has all the powers of a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 354, Sec. 5.   (AB 1768)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Pawnbrokers [343. - 343.]

343.

Every person who purchases gold bullion, gold bars or gold quartz or mineral containing gold, who fails, refuses, or neglects to produce for inspection his register, or to exhibit all articles received by him in pledge, or his account of sales, to any officer holding a warrant authorizing him to search for personal property or to any person appointed by the sheriff or head of the police department of any city, city and county or town, or an order of a committing magistrate directing such officer to inspect such register, or examine such articles or account of sales, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 638.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Other Injuries to Persons [346. - 367g.]

346.

Any person who, without the written permission of the owner or operator of the property on which an entertainment event is to be held or is being held, sells a ticket of admission to the entertainment event, which was obtained for the purpose of resale, at any price which is in excess of the price that is printed or endorsed upon the ticket, while on the grounds of or in the stadium, arena, theater, or other place where an event for which admission tickets are sold is to be held or is being held, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

347.

(a) (1) Every person who willfully mingles any poison or harmful substance with any food, drink, medicine, or pharmaceutical product or who willfully places any poison or harmful substance in any spring, well, reservoir, or public water supply, where the person knows or should have known that the same would be taken by any human being to his or her injury, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, four, or five years.

(2) Any violation of paragraph (1) involving the use of a poison or harmful substance that may cause death if ingested or that causes the infliction of great bodily injury on any person shall be punished by an additional term of three years.

(b) Any person who maliciously informs any other person that a poison or other harmful substance has been or will be placed in any food, drink, medicine, pharmaceutical product, or public water supply, knowing that such report is false, is guilty of a crime punishable by imprisonment in the state prison, or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year.

(c) The court may impose the maximum fine for each item tampered with in violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 287, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

347b.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to manufacture, sell, furnish, or give away, or offer to manufacture, sell, furnish, or give away any alcoholic solution of a potable nature containing any deleterious or poisonous substance, and the burden of proof shall be upon the person, firm, or corporation manufacturing, selling, furnishing, or giving away, or offering to manufacture, sell, furnish, or give away, any such alcoholic solution of a potable nature containing any deleterious or poisonous substance, to show that such alcoholic solution of a potable nature did not contain any deleterious or poisonous substance. Every person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1125.)
-------------------------------------------

350.

(a) Any person who willfully manufactures, intentionally sells, or knowingly possesses for sale any counterfeit mark registered with the Secretary of State or registered on the Principal Register of the United States Patent and Trademark Office, shall, upon conviction, be punishable as follows:

(1) When the offense involves less than 1,000 of the articles described in this subdivision, with a total retail or fair market value less than that required for grand theft as defined in Section 487, and if the person is an individual, he or she shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment; or, if the person is a business entity, by a fine of
 not more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(2) When the offense involves 1,000 or more of the articles described in this subdivision, or has a total retail or fair market value equal to or greater than that required for grand theft as defined in Section 487, and if the person is an individual, he or she shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years, or by a fine not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine; or, if the person is a business entity, by a fine not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(b) Any person who has been convicted of a violation of either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) shall, upon a subsequent conviction of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), if the person is an individual, be
 punished by a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years, or by both that fine and imprisonment; or, if the person is a business entity, by a fine of not more than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).

(c) Any person who has been convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) and who, by virtue of the conduct that was the basis of the conviction, has directly and foreseeably caused death or great bodily injury to another through reliance on the counterfeited item for its intended purpose shall, if the person is an individual, be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years, or by both that fine and imprisonment; or, if the person is a business entity, by a
 fine of not more than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), in any action brought under this section resulting in a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere, the court shall order the forfeiture and destruction of all of those marks and of all goods, articles, or other matter bearing the marks, and the forfeiture and destruction or other disposition of all means of making the marks, and any and all electrical, mechanical, or other devices for manufacturing, reproducing, transporting, or assembling these marks, that were used in connection with, or were part of, any violation of this section.

(2) Upon request of any law enforcement agency and consent from the specific registrants, the court may consider a motion to have the items described in paragraph (1), not including recordings or audiovisual works as defined
 in Section 653w, donated to a nonprofit organization for the purpose of distributing the goods to persons living in poverty at no charge to the persons served by the organization.

(3) Forfeiture of the proceeds of the crime shall be subject to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 186) of Title 7 of Part 1. However, no vehicle shall be forfeited under this section that may be lawfully driven on the highway with a class C, M1, or M2 license, as prescribed in Section 12804.9 of the Vehicle Code, and that is any of the following:

(A) A community property asset of a person other than the defendant.

(B) The sole class C, M1, or M2 vehicle available to the immediate family of that person or of the defendant.

(C) Reasonably necessary to be retained by the
 defendant for the purpose of lawfully earning a living, or for any other reasonable and lawful purpose.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) When counterfeited but unassembled components of computer software packages are recovered, including, but not limited to, counterfeited computer diskettes, instruction manuals, or licensing envelopes, the number of “articles” shall be equivalent to the number of completed computer software packages that could have been made from those components.

(2) “Business entity” includes, but is not limited to, a corporation, limited liability company, or partnership. “Business entity” does not include a sole proprietorship.

(3) “Counterfeit mark” means a spurious mark that is
 identical with, or confusingly similar to, a registered mark and is used, or intended to be used, on or in connection with the same type of goods or services for which the genuine mark is registered. It is not necessary for the mark to be displayed on the outside of an article for there to be a violation. For articles containing digitally stored information, it shall be sufficient to constitute a violation if the counterfeit mark appears on a video display when the information is retrieved from the article. The term “spurious mark” includes genuine marks used on or in connection with spurious articles and includes identical articles containing identical marks, where the goods or marks were reproduced without authorization of, or in excess of any authorization granted by, the registrant. When counterfeited but unassembled components of any articles described under subdivision (a) are recovered, including, but not limited to, labels, patches, fabric, stickers, wrappers, badges, emblems, medallions, charms,
 boxes, containers, cans, cases, hangtags, documentation, or packaging, or any other components of any type or nature that are designed, marketed, or otherwise intended to be used on or in connection with any articles described under subdivision (a), the number of “articles” shall be equivalent to the number of completed articles that could have been made from those components.

(4) “Knowingly possess” means that the person possessing an article knew or had reason to believe that it was spurious, or that it was used on or in connection with spurious articles, or that it was reproduced without authorization of, or in excess of any authorization granted by, the registrant.

(5) Notwithstanding Section 7, “person” includes, but is not limited to, a business entity.

(6) “Registrant” means any person to whom the registration
 of a mark is issued and that person’s legal representatives, successors, or assigns.

(7) “Sale” includes resale.

(8) “Value” has the following meanings:

(A) When counterfeit items of computer software are manufactured or possessed for sale, the “value” of those items shall be equivalent to the retail price or fair market price of the true items that are counterfeited.

(B) When counterfeited but unassembled components of computer software packages or any other articles described under subdivision (a) are recovered, including, but not limited to, counterfeited digital disks, instruction manuals, licensing envelopes, labels, patches, fabric, stickers, wrappers, badges, emblems, medallions, charms, boxes, containers, cans, cases, hangtags, documentation, or
 packaging, or any other components of any type or nature that are designed, marketed, or otherwise intended to be used on or in connection with any articles described under subdivision (a), the “value” of those components shall be equivalent to the retail price or fair market value of the number of completed computer software packages or other completed articles described under subdivision (a) that could have been made from those components.

(C) “Retail or fair market value” of a counterfeit article means a value equivalent to the retail price or fair market value, as of the last day of the charged crime, of a completed similar genuine article containing a genuine mark.

(f) This section shall not be enforced against any party who has adopted and lawfully used the same or confusingly similar mark in the rendition of like services or the manufacture or sale of like goods in this
 state from a date prior to the earliest effective date of registration of the service mark or trademark either with the Secretary of State or on the Principle Register of the United States Patent and Trademark Office.

(g) An owner, officer, employee, or agent who provides, rents, leases, licenses, or sells real property upon which a violation of subdivision (a) occurs shall not be subject to a criminal penalty pursuant to this section, unless he or she sells, or possesses for sale, articles bearing a counterfeit mark in violation of this section. This subdivision shall not be construed to abrogate or limit any civil rights or remedies for a trademark violation.

(h) This section shall not be enforced against any party who engages in fair uses of a mark, as specified in Section 14247 of the Business and Professions Code.

(i) When a person is convicted of an offense under this section, the court shall order the person to pay restitution to the trademark owner and any other victim of the offense pursuant to Section 1202.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 867, Sec. 19.   (SB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

351a.

Any person who sells, attempts to sell, offers for sale or assists in the sale of any goods, product or output, and who willfully and falsely represents such goods, product or output to be the goods, product or output of any dealer, manufacturer or producer, other than the true dealer, manufacturer or producer, or any member of a firm or any officer of a corporation, who knowingly permits any employee of such firm or corporation to sell, offer for sale or assist in the sale of any goods, product or output or to falsely represent such goods, product or output to be the goods, product or output of any dealer, manufacturer or producer, other than the true dealer, manufacturer or producer, is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than six hundred dollars ($600), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 20 or more than 90 days, or both. This section shall not apply to any person who sells or offers for sale under his own name or brand the product or output of another manufacturer or producer with the written consent of such manufacturer or producer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 271.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

355.

Every person who defaces or obliterates the marks upon wrecked property, or in any manner disguises the appearance thereof, with intent to prevent the owner from discovering its identity, or who destroys or suppresses any invoice, bill of lading, or other document tending to show the ownership, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

356.

Every person who cuts out, alters, or defaces any mark made upon any log, lumber, or wood, or puts a false mark thereon with intent to prevent the owner from discovering its identity, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

359.

Every person authorized to solemnize marriage, who willfully and knowingly solemnizes any incestuous or other marriage forbidden by law, is punishable by fine of not less than one hundred nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the County Jail not less than three months nor more than one year, or by both.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

360.

Every person authorized to solemnize any marriage, who solemnizes a marriage without first being presented with the marriage license, as required by Section 421 of the Family Code; or who solemnizes a marriage pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 500) of Division 3 of the Family Code without the authorization required by that part; or who willfully makes a false return of any marriage or pretended marriage to the recorder or clerk and every person who willfully makes a false record of any marriage return, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 39, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

362.

Every officer or person to whom a writ of habeas corpus may be directed, who, after service thereof, neglects or refuses to obey the command thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

363.

Every person who, either solely or as member of a Court, knowingly and unlawfully recommits, imprisons, or restrains of his liberty, for the same cause, any person who has been discharged upon a writ of habeas corpus, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

364.

Every person having in his custody, or under his restraint or power, any person for whose relief a writ of habeas corpus has been issued, who, with the intent to elude the service of such writ or to avoid the effect thereof, transfers such person to the custody of another, or places him under the power or control of another, or conceals or changes the place of his confinement or restraint, or removes him without the jurisdiction of the Court or Judge issuing the writ, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

365.

Every person, and every agent or officer of any corporation carrying on business as an innkeeper, or as a common carrier of passengers, who refuses, without just cause or excuse, to receive and entertain any guest, or to receive and carry any passenger, is guilty of a misdemeanor. However, an innkeeper who has proceeded as authorized by Section 1865 of the Civil Code shall be rebuttably presumed to have acted with just cause or excuse for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 354, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

365.5.

(a) Any blind person, deaf person, or disabled person, who is a passenger on any common carrier, airplane, motor vehicle, railway train, motorbus, streetcar, boat, or any other public conveyance or mode of transportation operating within this state, shall be entitled to have with him or her a specially trained guide dog, signal dog, or service dog.

(b) No blind person, deaf person, or disabled person and his or her specially trained guide dog, signal dog, or service dog shall be denied admittance to accommodations, advantages, facilities, medical facilities, including hospitals, clinics, and physicians’ offices, telephone facilities, adoption agencies, private schools, hotels, lodging places, places of public accommodation, amusement, or resort, and other places to which the general public is invited within this state because of that guide dog, signal dog, or service dog.

(c) Any person, firm, association, or corporation, or the agent of any person, firm, association, or corporation, who prevents a disabled person from exercising, or interferes with a disabled person in the exercise of, the rights specified in this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(d) As used in this section, “guide dog” means any guide dog or Seeing Eye dog that was trained by a person licensed under Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or that meets the definitional criteria under federal regulations adopted to implement Title III of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336).

(e) As used in this section, “signal dog” means any dog trained to alert a deaf person, or a person whose hearing is impaired, to intruders or sounds.

(f) As used in this section, “service dog” means any dog individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability, including, but not limited to, minimal protection work, rescue work, pulling a wheelchair, or fetching dropped items.

(g) (1) Nothing in this section is intended to affect any civil remedies available for a violation of this section.

(2) This section is intended to provide equal accessibility for all owners or trainers of animals that are trained as guide dogs, signal dogs, or service dogs in a manner that is no less than that provided by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336) and the Air Carrier Access Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-435).

(h) The exercise of rights specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) by any person may not be conditioned upon payment of any extra charge, provided that the person shall be liable for any provable damage done to the premises or facilities by his or her dog.

(i) Any trainer or individual with a disability may take dogs in any of the places specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) for the purpose of training the dogs as guide dogs, signal dogs, or service dogs. The person shall ensure that the dog is on a leash and tagged as a guide dog, signal dog, or service dog by an identification tag issued by the county clerk or animal control department as authorized by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 30850) of Division 14 of the Food and Agricultural Code. In addition, the person shall be liable for any provable damage done to the premises or facilities by his or her dog.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 498, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

365.6.

(a) Any person who, with no legal justification, intentionally interferes with the use of a guide, signal, or service dog or mobility aid by harassing or obstructing the guide, signal, or service dog or mobility aid user or his or her guide, signal, or service dog, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Mobility aid” means any device enabling a person with a disability, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 54 of the Civil Code, to travel independently, including, but not limited to, a guide, signal, or service dog, as defined in Section 54.1 of the Civil Code, a wheelchair, walker or white cane.

(2) “Guide, signal, or service dog” means any dog trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability, including, but not limited to, guiding individuals with impaired vision, alerting individuals with impaired hearing to intruders or sounds, pulling a wheelchair, or fetching dropped items.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to affect any civil remedies available for a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

365.7.
